Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202587-1309
Act, violation; deceptive trade practice; compliance officer; civil penalty.

(1) Any violation of the Age-Appropriate Online Design Code Act shall, additionally and separately, constitute a deceptive trade practice under the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act. Civil penalties for violations of the Age-Appropriate Online Design Code Act shall be subject exclusively to subsection (3) of this section, but the Attorney General shall not initiate any action to recover a civil penalty under the act until July 1, 2026. The Age-Appropriate Online Design Code Act shall not be construed to affect the liability for any action that otherwise violates the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act.

(2) Each covered online service shall designate one or more of its officers to be responsible for the covered online service's compliance with the Age-Appropriate Online Design Code Act.

(3) Beginning July 1, 2026, a covered online service in violation of the Age-Appropriate Online Design Code Act may be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed fifty thousand dollars for each violation. All penalties collected under this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 2025, LB504, § 9.

Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act, see section 87-306.